Utah statutes.
10-8-93.   Control of funds and disbursements -- Auditing of accounts by county auditor -- Transfer of county tax funds to board to cover deficiencies.

The joint board created pursuant to this act shall have the custody and control of all funds collected in the joint operation of such hospital and the disbursement thereof; provided that the county auditor of any county participating under the provisions of this act shall audit the accounts of said board quarterly or at more frequent intervals, if public interest, in the judgment of such auditor requires a more frequent audit. The county executive of any county participating in the operation and maintenance of hospitals pursuant to this act may pay over to the joint board of such hospitals any funds yielded by a levy made pursuant to Section 17-53-221 that may be required to cover any deficiencies incurred in the operation and maintenance of such hospital.



Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

